Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2698.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1526 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1526. Youth Suicide Awareness and Prevention.--* * * (c.1) The following shall apply to student suicide awareness and prevention education:(1) Beginning with the first school year that commences within twenty-four (24) months of the effective date of this subsection, each school entity serving students in grades six through twelve shall provide students at least one (1) hour or 1234567891011121314151617181920 one (1) standard class period of evidence-based, age-appropriate suicide awareness and prevention education each school year. The following shall apply:(i) A school entity may deliver the education in person or by electronic means.(ii) A school entity may use a combined program that satisfies this subsection and section 1526.1(a) to meet the requirement under this paragraph.(2) Within one (1) year of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall develop a list of evidence-based, age-appropriate educational materials, including no-cost programming, if any, to fulfill the requirements of this subsection. At a minimum, the educational materials or curriculum shall:(i) teach students how to identify signs and signals of depression, suicide risk and self-injury in themselves and their peers;(ii) emphasize the importance of seeking help for themselves and their peers; and(iii) describe the process for seeking help, including how and where to report concerns and the resources available within the school entity and the community.(3) The department shall post the list under paragraph (2) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(4) As used in this subsection, the term "evidence-based" shall have the meaning given to it in section 1526.1(e).* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1526.1. Violence Prevention and Social Isolation Awareness.--(a) The following shall apply to student safety and 20260HB2698PN3777 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violence prevention education:(1) Beginning with the first school year that commences within twenty-four (24) months of the effective date of this section, each school entity serving students in grades six through twelve shall provide students at least one (1) hour or one (1) standard class period of evidence-based, age-appropriate youth violence prevention education each school year. The following shall apply:(i) A school entity may deliver the education in person or by electronic means.(ii) A school entity may use a combined program that satisfies this subsection and section 1526(c.1) to meet the requirement under this paragraph.(2) Within one (1) year of the effective date of this section, the department shall develop a list of evidence-based, age-appropriate educational materials, including no-cost programming, if any, to fulfill the requirements of this subsection. At a minimum, the educational materials or curriculum shall teach students:(i) how to identify observable warning signs and signals of an individual whose threatening or at-risk behavior may present a threat to the individual or others;(ii) the importance of taking threats seriously and seeking help; and(iii) the steps for reporting dangerous, violent, threatening, harmful or potentially harmful activity, including through the Safe2Say Something Program.(3) The department shall post the list under paragraph (2) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) The following shall apply to student social isolation 20260HB2698PN3777 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 awareness education:(1) Beginning with the first school year that commences within twenty-four (24) months of the effective date of this section, each school entity serving students in kindergarten through grade twelve shall provide students at least one (1) hour or one (1) standard class period of evidence-based, age-appropriate social isolation awareness education each school year. A school entity may deliver the awareness education in person or by electronic means.(2) Within one (1) year of the effective date of this section, the department shall develop a list of evidence-based, age-appropriate educational materials, including no-cost programming, if any, to fulfill the requirements of this subsection. At a minimum, the educational materials or curriculum shall inform students:(i) what social isolation is and how to identify social isolation in others;(ii) the importance of taking social isolation seriously and seeking help for peers; and(iii) how to use strategies to be more socially inclusive in the classroom and community and to establish connections with peers.(3) The department shall post the list under paragraph (2) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) The following shall apply to student-led violence prevention clubs:(1) Within one (1) year of the effective date of this section, the department may require a school entity serving students in kindergarten through grade twelve to designate a student-led violence prevention club that:20260HB2698PN3777 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) is open to all members of the student body of the school entity; and(ii) has at least one (1) identified adult adviser of the club.(2) A student-led violence prevention club may:(i) sustain awareness activities related to suicide prevention, violence prevention and social isolation prevention; and(ii) foster opportunities for student leadership development.(d) To offset costs associated with implementing subsections (a), (b) and (c), the department shall, to the extent practicable, apply for Federal or State funding made available to the department for the improvement of school safety.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Evidence-based." A program or practice that demonstrates any of the following:(1) A statistically significant effect on relevant outcomes based on:(i) strong evidence from not fewer than one (1) well-designed and well-implemented experimental study;(ii) moderate evidence from not fewer than one (1) well-designed and well-implemented quasi-experimental study; or(iii) promising evidence from not fewer than one (1) well-designed and well-implemented correlational study with statistical controls for selection bias.20260HB2698PN3777 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A rationale based on high-quality research findings or positive evaluation that the program or practice is likely to improve relevant outcomes, including ongoing efforts to examine the effects of the program or practice."School entity." A school district, joint school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2698PN3777 - 6 - 12345678